Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 3. Regional Planning Commissions
§ 4350.
Review and consultation regarding municipal planning effort.

A regional planning commission shall consult with its municipalities with respect to the municipalities’ planning efforts, ascertaining the municipalities’ needs as individual municipalities and as neighbors in a region, and identifying the assistance that ought to be provided by the regional planning commission. As a part of this consultation, the regional planning commission, after public notice, shall review the planning process of its member municipalities at least twice during an eight-year period, or more frequently on request of the municipality, and shall so confirm when a municipality:

is engaged in a continuing planning process that, within a reasonable time, will result in a plan that is consistent with the goals contained in section 4302 of this title;

is engaged in a process to implement its municipal plan, consistent with the program for implementation required under section 4382 of this title; and

is maintaining its efforts to provide local funds for municipal and regional planning purposes.

As part of the consultation process, the commission shall consider whether a municipality has adopted a plan. In order to obtain or retain confirmation of the planning process, a municipality must have an approved plan. A regional planning commission shall review and approve plans of its member municipalities, when approval is requested and warranted. Each review shall include a public hearing which is noticed at least 15 days in advance by posting in the office of the municipal clerk and at least one public place within the municipality and by publication in a newspaper or newspapers of general publication in the region affected. The commission shall approve a plan if it finds that the plan:
(b) (1) As part of the consultation process, the commission shall consider whether a municipality has adopted a plan. In order to obtain or retain confirmation of the planning process, a municipality must have an approved plan. A regional planning commission shall review and approve plans of its member municipalities, when approval is requested and warranted. Each review shall include a public hearing which is noticed at least 15 days in advance by posting in the office of the municipal clerk and at least one public place within the municipality and by publication in a newspaper or newspapers of general publication in the region affected. The commission shall approve a plan if it finds that the plan:

is consistent with the goals established in section 4302 of this title;

is compatible with its regional plan;

is compatible with approved plans of other municipalities in the region; and

contains all the elements included in subdivisions 4382(a)(1)-(12) of this title.

A commission shall give approval or disapproval to a municipal plan or amendment within two months of its receipt following a final hearing held pursuant to section 4385 of this title. The fact that the plan is approved after the deadline shall not invalidate the plan. If the commission disapproves the plan or amendment, it shall state its reasons in writing and, if appropriate, suggest acceptable modifications. Submissions for approval that follow a disapproval shall receive approval or disapproval within 45 days.

The commission shall file any adopted plan or amendment with the Department of Housing and Community Development within two weeks of receipt from the municipality. Failure on the part of the commission to file the plan shall not invalidate the plan.

In order to retain confirmation of the planning process, a municipality shall document that it has reviewed and is actively engaged in a process to implement its adopted plan.

When assessing whether a municipality has been actively engaged in a process to implement its adopted plan, the regional planning commission shall consider the activities of local boards and commissions with regard to the preparation or adoption of bylaws and amendments; capital budgets and programs; supplemental plans; or other actions, programs, or measures undertaken or scheduled to implement the adopted plan. The regional planning commission shall also consider factors that may have hindered or delayed municipal implementation efforts.

The consultation may include guidance by the regional planning commission with regard to resources and technical support available to the municipality to implement its adopted plan and recommendations by the regional planning commission for plan amendments and for updating the plan prior to readoption under section 4387 of this title.

During the period of time when a municipal planning process is confirmed:

The municipality’s plan will not be subject to review by the Commissioner of Housing and Community Development under section 4351 of this title.

State agency plans adopted under 3 V.S.A. chapter 67 shall be compatible with the municipality’s approved plan.

The municipality may levy impact fees on new development within its borders, according to the provisions of chapter 131 of this title.

The municipality shall be eligible to receive additional funds from the municipal and regional planning fund.

Confirmation and approval decisions under this section shall be made by majority vote of the commissioners representing municipalities, in accordance with the bylaws of the regional planning commission.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. July 1, 1989; amended

1989, No. 101

, § 4;

1989, No. 280

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 87;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § G5, eff. June 1, 2010;

2015, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4351.
Review by Commissioner of Housing and Community Development.

The Commissioner of Housing and Community Development shall establish guidelines for the provision of affordable housing by municipalities with plans that have not been approved under this chapter. These guidelines shall be consistent with goals established in section 4302 of this title.

On a periodic basis, commencing in 1996, the Commissioner of Housing and Community Development, or a designee, shall review the planning process of municipalities that do not have approved plans, for compliance with the affordable housing criteria established under this section and shall issue a report to the municipality and to the regional planning commission. Each review shall include a public hearing which is noticed at least 15 days in advance by posting in the office of the municipal clerk and at least one public place within the municipality and by publication in a newspaper or newspapers of general publication in the region affected.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 15a, eff. July 1, 1989; amended

1989, No. 101

, § 5;

1989, No. 280

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 88;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § G5, eff. June 1, 2010.

§ 4352.
Optional determination of energy compliance; enhanced energy planning.

Regional plan. A regional planning commission may submit its adopted regional plan to the Commissioner of Public Service appointed under

30 V.S.A. § 1

for a determination of energy compliance. The Commissioner shall issue an affirmative determination on finding that the regional plan meets the requirements of subsection (c) of this section and allows for the siting in the region of all types of renewable generation technologies.

Municipal plan. If the Commissioner of Public Service has issued an affirmative determination of energy compliance for a regional plan that is in effect, a municipal legislative body within the region may submit its adopted municipal plan to the regional planning commission for issuance of a determination of energy compliance. The regional planning commission shall issue an affirmative determination, signed by the chair of the regional planning commission, on finding that the municipal plan meets the requirements of subsection (c) of this section and is consistent with the regional plan.

Enhanced energy planning; requirements. To obtain an affirmative determination of energy compliance under this section, a plan must:

in the case of a regional plan, include the energy element as described in subdivision 4348a(a)(3) of this title;

in the case of a municipal plan, include an energy element that has the same components as described in subdivision 4348a(a)(3) of this title for a regional plan and be confirmed under section 4350 of this title;

be consistent with the following, with consistency determined in the manner described under subdivision 4302(f)(1) of this title:

Vermont’s greenhouse gas reduction goals under

10 V.S.A. § 578(a)

;

Vermont’s 25 by 25 goal for renewable energy under

10 V.S.A. § 580

;

Vermont’s building efficiency goals under

10 V.S.A. § 581

;

State energy policy under

30 V.S.A. § 202a

and the recommendations for regional and municipal energy planning pertaining to the efficient use of energy and the siting and development of renewable energy resources contained in the State energy plans adopted pursuant to

30 V.S.A. §§ 202

and 202b; and

the distributed renewable generation and energy transformation categories of resources to meet the requirements of the Renewable Energy Standard under

30 V.S.A. §§ 8004

and 8005; and

meet the standards for issuing a determination of energy compliance included in the State energy plans.

State energy plans; recommendations; standards.

The State energy plans shall include the recommendations for regional and municipal energy planning and the standards for issuing a determination of energy compliance described in subdivision (c)(3) of this section.

The recommendations shall provide strategies and options for regional planning commissions and municipalities to employ in meeting the goals and policies contained in statutes listed in subdivision (c)(3) of this section.

The standards shall consist of a list of criteria for issuing a determination of energy compliance that ensure consistency with the goals and policies contained in the statutes listed in subdivision (c)(3) of this section and the recommendations developed pursuant to this subsection.

In developing standards and recommendations under this subsection, the Commissioner of Public Service shall consult with all persons identified under

30 V.S.A. § 202(d)(1)

; the Secretaries of Agriculture, Food and Markets, of Commerce and Community Development, of Natural Resources, and of Transportation; and other affected persons.

The Commissioner of Public Service shall provide the Commissioner of Housing and Community Development with a copy of the recommendations and standards developed under this subsection for inclusion in the planning and land use manual prepared pursuant to section 4304 of this title.

Process for issuing determinations of energy compliance. Review of whether to issue a determination of energy compliance under this section shall include a public hearing noticed at least 15 days in advance by direct mail or electronically with proof of receipt to the requesting regional planning commission or municipal legislative body, posting on the website of the entity from which the determination is requested, and publication in a newspaper of general publication in the region or municipality affected. The Commissioner or regional planning commission shall issue the determination in writing within two months after the receipt of a request for a determination. If the determination is negative, the Commissioner or regional planning commission shall state the reasons for denial in writing and, if appropriate, suggest acceptable modifications. Submissions for a new determination that follow a negative determination shall receive a new determination within 45 days.

Appeal. A regional planning commission aggrieved by an act or decision of the Commissioner of Public Service under this section may appeal to the Natural Resources Board established under 10 V.S.A. chapter 151 within 30 days of the act or decision. The provisions of

10 V.S.A. § 6024

regarding assistance to the Board from other departments and agencies of the State shall apply to this subsection. The Board shall conduct a de novo hearing on the act or decision under appeal and shall proceed in accordance with the contested case requirements of the Vermont Administrative Procedure Act. The Board shall issue a final decision within 90 days of the filing of the appeal.

Municipality; determination from DPS; time-limited option. Until July 1, 2018, a municipality whose plan has been confirmed under section 4350 of this title may seek issuance of a determination of energy compliance from the Commissioner of Public Service if it is a member of a regional planning commission whose regional plan has not received such a determination.

The Commissioner shall issue an affirmative determination of energy compliance for the municipal plan on finding that the plan meets the requirements of subsection (c) of this section. The Commissioner’s review of the municipal plan shall be for the purpose only of determining whether a determination of energy compliance should be issued because those requirements are met.

A municipality aggrieved by an act or decision of the Commissioner under this subsection may appeal in accordance with the procedures of subsection (f) of this section.

Determination; time period. An affirmative determination of energy compliance issued pursuant to this section shall remain in effect until the end of the period for expiration or readoption of the plan to which it applies.

Commissioner; consultation. In the discharge of the duties assigned under this section, the Commissioner shall consult with and solicit the recommendations of the Secretaries of Agriculture, Food and Markets, of Commerce and Community Development, of Natural Resources, and of Transportation.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. June 13, 2016; amended

2017, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.